Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2884XS (3) 91 dg/ko S.F. 602 Section 1. Section 144.26, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. a. The department shall establish 3 procedures to allow for a modification and substitution of a 4 death certificate when a brain autopsy performed by a person 5 or laboratory licensed or authorized by the state to perform 6 an autopsy, or by an accredited medical school located in 7 the United States, provides additional information regarding 8 conditions that may have contributed to a decedentâs death. 9 b. Notwithstanding subsection 4, a modification and 10 substitution of a death certificate under this subsection 11 shall not require a court order if a person applies for the 12 modification and substitution within ten years of the date of 13 the decedentâs death. 14 c. A substituted death certificate under this subsection 15 shall comply with requirements pursuant to sections 144.38 and 16 144.41. 17 d. The state shall not charge a fee for a modification and 18 substitution of a death certificate under this subsection. 19 e. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 20 to implement this subsection. 21